California statutes. Education Code
(II) Engaged in an educational program for English language learners or to attain a high school diploma or general educational development certificate.

(III) Employed or seeking employment.

(IV) Seeking permanent housing for family stability.

(V) Incapacitated.

(VI) Participating in a CalWORKs program activity.

(2) (A) Commencing July 1, 2022, at least 5 percent of a full-day California state preschool program contracting agency’s funded enrollment shall be reserved for children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(B) (i) The department shall review data on compliance and provide technical assistance to California state preschool program contracting agencies to assist them in meeting the requirement described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) Agencies shall be fully funded for the percentage of enrollment specified in subparagraph (A), inclusive of the exceptional needs adjustment factor for that enrollment pursuant to Section 8244, to ensure funding is available to enroll children with exceptional needs within the set aside specified in subparagraph (A) at any point during the fiscal year. An agency not meeting the requirement to fill the percent
 of funded enrollment specified in subparagraph (A) with children with exceptional needs shall conduct community outreach to special education partners to recruit additional children with exceptional needs into their programs.

(iii) (I) Any agency not meeting the applicable requirement described in subclause (II) may be put on a conditional contract as described in Section 8314 unless they have applied and been approved for a waiver pursuant to subclause (III).

(II) On and after July 1, 2026, any agency not meeting the 5-percent requirement pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(III) The Superintendent shall create an ongoing waiver process for agencies not able to meet the requirement described in subparagraph (A).

(C) Children with
 exceptional needs attending California state preschool programs shall be educated in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(D) (i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this paragraph, the department shall implement this paragraph through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2022.

(ii) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement this paragraph on or before December 31, 2023.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a full-day
 California state preschool program may provide services to children in families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213, after all eligible two-, three-, and four-year-old children have been enrolled pursuant to paragraph (1). No more than 10 percent of children enrolled, as calculated throughout the participating program’s entire contract, may be filled by children in families above the income eligibility threshold.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), after all families meeting the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) and (3) have been enrolled, a full-day California state preschool program may provide services to two-, three-, and four-year-old children in families who do not meet at least one of the criteria specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(5) After all otherwise eligible children have been
 enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4), a provider operating a full-day California state preschool program within the attendance boundary of a public school or school district, as set forth in Section 8217, may enroll any two-, three-, or four-year-old child.

(e) (1) With the exception of the age requirements and paragraphs (3) and (4), upon establishing initial eligibility for full-day California state preschool program services under this chapter, a family shall be considered to meet all eligibility and need requirements for those services for not less than 24 months, shall receive those services for not less than 24 months before having their eligibility or need recertified, and shall not be required to report changes to income or other changes for at least 24 months, including when a family member transfers to another California state preschool program or when a child is voluntarily disenrolled by their
 family for any period of time during eligibility.

(2) In the event that the eligibility period as described in paragraph (1) ends before the end of a program year, eligibility shall be extended until the end of the program year, as long as applicable age-eligibility requirements are met, as specified in Section 8205.

(3) A family may, at any time, voluntarily report income or other changes. This information shall be used, as applicable, to reduce the family’s fees, increase the family’s services, or extend the period of the family’s eligibility before recertification.

(f) (1) Because a family that meets eligibility requirements at its most recent eligibility certification or recertification is considered eligible until the next recertification, as provided in subdivision (d), a payment made by a
 preschool program for a child during this period shall not be considered an error or an improper payment due to a change in the family’s circumstances during that same period.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designated agent may seek to recover payments that are the result of fraud.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement subdivision (e), the department shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section prior to regulatory action on subdivision (e) through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before January 1, 2027. These management bulletins or similar letters of instruction shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement subdivision (e) on or before December 31, 2027.

(h) The Superintendent shall establish guidelines according to which the director or a duly authorized representative of the California state preschool program will certify children as eligible for state reimbursement purposes.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 3.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

8208.

(a) (1) A child is eligible for the part-day California state preschool program if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The child is one of the following:

(i) A three-year-old child.

(ii) A four-year-old child.

(iii) Enrolled in kindergarten pursuant to Section 48000.

(B) The child’s family is one of the following:

(i) A current aid recipient.

(ii) Income eligible.

(iii) Homeless.

(iv) One whose children are recipients of child protective services, or whose children have been identified as being abused, neglected, or exploited, or at risk of being abused, neglected, or exploited.

(v) (I) One that has children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(II) Only the children in the family who are children with exceptional needs may be enrolled under the eligibility criteria of this clause. Any other child in the family without exceptional needs may be enrolled pursuant to any of the criteria established in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(vi) One who has a member of its household who is
 certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department. Children eligible for services pursuant to this subparagraph shall be prioritized by the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program.

(vii) One whose parent or guardian is employed by a local educational agency.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a part-day California state preschool program may provide services to children in families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213, after all eligible three- and four-year-old
 children have been enrolled. No more than 10 percent of children enrolled, calculated throughout the participating program’s entire contract, may be filled by children in families above the income eligibility threshold.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 8213, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), a part-day California state preschool program may provide services to three- and four-year-old children in families whose income is above the income eligibility threshold if those children are children with exceptional needs. Children receiving services pursuant to this paragraph shall not count towards the 10-percent limit in paragraph (2).

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, a provider operating a part-day state preschool program
 within the attendance boundary of a public school or school district, as set forth in Section 8217, may enroll three- and four-year-old children.

(b) A part-day California state preschool program contracting agency shall certify eligibility and enroll families into their program within 120 calendar days prior to the first day of the beginning of the new preschool year. Subsequent to enrollment, a child shall be deemed eligible for a part-day California state preschool program for the remainder of the program year and for the following program year, as long as applicable age-eligibility requirements are met, as specified in Sections 8205 and 48000.

(c) (1) Commencing July 1, 2022, at least 5 percent of a part-day California state preschool program contracting agency’s funded enrollment shall be reserved for children with exceptional needs, as defined in
 Section 8205.

(2) (A) The department shall review data on compliance and provide technical assistance to California state preschool program contracting agencies to assist them in meeting the requirement described in paragraph (1).

(B) Agencies shall be fully funded for the percentage of enrollment specified in paragraph (1), inclusive of the exceptional needs adjustment factor for that enrollment pursuant to Section 8244, to ensure funding is available to enroll children with exceptional needs within the set aside specified in paragraph (1) at any point during the fiscal year. An agency not meeting the requirement to fill the percent of funded enrollment specified in paragraph (1) with children with exceptional needs shall conduct community outreach to special education partners to recruit additional children with exceptional needs into their programs.

(C) (i) Any agency not meeting the applicable requirement described in clause (ii) may be put on a conditional contract as described in Section 8314 unless they have applied and been approved for a waiver pursuant to clause (iii).

(ii) On and after July 1, 2026, any agency not meeting the 5-percent requirement pursuant to paragraph (1).

(iii) The Superintendent shall create an ongoing waiver process for an agency not able to meet the requirement described in paragraph (1).

(3) Children with exceptional needs attending California state preschool programs shall be educated in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this subdivision, the department shall implement this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2022.

(B) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement this subdivision on or before December 31, 2023.

(d) (1) A child is eligible for a full-day California state preschool program if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The child is one of the following:

(i) A three-year-old child.

(ii) A four-year-old child.

(B) The child’s family is one of the following:

(i) A current aid recipient.

(ii) Income eligible.

(iii) Homeless.

(iv) One whose children are recipients of child protective services, or whose children have been identified as being abused, neglected, or exploited, or at risk of being abused, neglected, or exploited.

(v) (I) One that has children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(II) Only the children in the family who are children with exceptional needs may be enrolled under the eligibility criteria of this clause. Any other child in the family without exceptional needs may be enrolled pursuant to any of the criteria established in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(vi) One who has a member of its household who is certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department. Children eligible for services pursuant to this subparagraph shall be prioritized by the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program.

(vii) One whose parent or guardian is employed by a local educational agency.

(C) The child’s family needs the childcare services because of either of the following:

(i) The child has been identified by a legal, medical, or social services agency, a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a Head Start program, or an emergency or transitional shelter as one of the following:

(I) A recipient of protective services.

(II) Being neglected, abused, or exploited, or at risk of neglect, abuse, or exploitation.

(III) Being
 homeless.

(ii) The child’s parents are one of the following:

(I) Engaged in vocational training leading directly to a recognized trade, paraprofession, or profession.

(II) Engaged in an educational program for English language learners or to attain a high school diploma or general educational development certificate.

(III) Employed or seeking employment.

(IV) Seeking permanent housing for family stability.

(V) Incapacitated.

(VI) Participating in a CalWORKs program activity.

(2) (A) Commencing July 1, 2022, at least 5 percent of a full-day California state preschool program contracting agency’s funded enrollment shall be reserved for children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(B) (i) The department shall review data on compliance and provide technical assistance to California state preschool program contracting agencies to assist them in meeting the requirement described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) (I) Agencies shall be fully funded for the percentage of enrollment specified in subparagraph (A), inclusive of the exceptional needs adjustment factor for that enrollment pursuant to Section 8244, to ensure funding is available to enroll children with exceptional needs within the
 set aside specified in subparagraph (A) at any point during the fiscal year. An agency not meeting the requirement to fill the percent of funded enrollment specified in subparagraph (A) with children with exceptional needs shall conduct community outreach to special education partners to recruit additional children with exceptional needs into their programs.

(II) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, any portion of funding provided under this paragraph that is not earned during the fiscal year shall not be retained by the agency and shall be subject to recovery by the department.

(iii) (I) Any agency not meeting the applicable requirement described in subclause (II) may be put on a conditional contract as described in Section 8314 unless they have
 applied and been approved for a waiver pursuant to subclause (III).

(II) On and after July 1, 2026, any agency not meeting the 5-percent requirement pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(III) The Superintendent shall create an ongoing waiver process for agencies not able to meet the requirement described in subparagraph (A).

(C) Children with exceptional needs attending California state preschool programs shall be educated in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(D) (i)Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section
 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this paragraph, the department shall implement this paragraph through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2022.

(ii) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement this paragraph on or before December 31, 2023.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a full-day California state preschool program may provide services to children in families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213, after all eligible three- and four-year-old children have been enrolled pursuant to paragraph (1). No more than 10 percent of children enrolled, as calculated throughout the participating program’s entire contract, may be filled by children in families above the income eligibility threshold.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), after all families meeting the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) and (3) have been enrolled, a full-day California state preschool program may provide services to three- and four-year-old children in families who do not meet at least one of the criteria specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(5) After all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4), a provider operating a full-day California state preschool program within the attendance boundary of a public school or school district, as set forth in Section 8217, may enroll any three- or four-year-old child.

(e) (1) With the exception of the age requirements and paragraphs (3) and (4), upon establishing initial eligibility for full-day California state
 preschool program services under this chapter, a family shall be considered to meet all eligibility and need requirements for those services for not less than 24 months, shall receive those services for not less than 24 months before having their eligibility or need recertified, and shall not be required to report changes to income or other changes for at least 24 months, including when a family member transfers to another California state preschool program or when a child is voluntarily disenrolled by their family for any period of time during eligibility.

(2) In the event that the eligibility period as described in paragraph (1) ends before the end of a program year, eligibility shall be extended until the end of the program year, as long as applicable age-eligibility requirements are met, as specified in Section 8205.

(3) A family may, at any time, voluntarily report income or
 other changes. This information shall be used, as applicable, to reduce the family’s fees, increase the family’s services, or extend the period of the family’s eligibility before recertification.

(f) (1) Because a family that meets eligibility requirements at its most recent eligibility certification or recertification is considered eligible until the next recertification, as provided in subdivision (d), a payment made by a preschool program for a child during this period shall not be considered an error or an improper payment due to a change in the family’s circumstances during that same period.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designated agent may seek to recover payments that are the result of fraud.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding
 the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement subdivision (e), the department shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section prior to regulatory action on subdivision (e) through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before January 1, 2027. These management bulletins or similar letters of instruction shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement subdivision (e) on or before December 31, 2027.

(h) The Superintendent shall establish guidelines according to which the director or a duly authorized representative of the California state preschool program will certify children as eligible for state reimbursement purposes.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 4.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8209.

(a) A physical examination and evaluation, including age-appropriate immunizations, shall be required before, or within six weeks of, enrollment in a preschool program. A standard, rule, or regulation shall not require medical examination or immunization for admission to a preschool program of a child whose parent or guardian files a letter with the governing board of the preschool program stating that the medical examination or immunization is contrary to the parent’s or guardian’s religious beliefs, or provide for the exclusion of a child from the program because of a parent or guardian having filed the letter. However, if there is good cause to believe that a child is suffering from a recognized contagious or infectious disease, the child shall be temporarily excluded from the program until the governing
 board of the preschool program is satisfied that the child is not suffering from that contagious or infectious disease.

(b) If only one parent has signed an application for enrollment in preschool services, as required by this chapter or regulations adopted to implement this chapter, and the information provided on the application indicates that there is a second parent who has not signed the application, the parent who has signed the application shall self-certify the presence or absence of the second parent under penalty of perjury. The parent who has signed the application shall not be required to submit additional information documenting the presence or absence of the second parent.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to promote continuity of services, a family enrolled in a state or federally funded preschool program whose services would otherwise be terminated
 because the family no longer meets the program income, eligibility, or need criteria may continue to receive preschool services in another state or federally funded preschool program if the contractor is able to transfer the family’s enrollment to another program for which the family is eligible before the date of termination of services or to exchange the family’s existing enrollment with the enrollment of a family in another program, provided that both families satisfy the eligibility requirements for the program in which they are being enrolled. The transfer of enrollment may be to another program within the same administrative agency or to another agency that administers state or federally funded preschool programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 22.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8210.

(a) Each applicant or contracting agency shall give priority for part-day programs according to the following:

(1) The first priority for services shall be given to three-year-old or four-year-old children who are recipients of child protective services or who are at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited and for whom there is a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency. If an agency is unable to enroll a child in this first priority category, the agency shall refer the child’s parent or guardian to local resources and referral services so that services for the child can be located. To the extent the contractor has elected to offer services pursuant to Section 8207.1, then priority for services shall be given to two-year-old children
 who are recipients of child protective services or who are at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited and for whom there is a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency.

(2) (A) The second priority for services shall be given to all three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes below the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) Within this priority category, children with exceptional needs from families with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(C) If enrollment of children with exceptional needs does not exceed the set aside pursuant to Section
 8208, this priority category shall also include three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213. Families served under this subparagraph with the lowest income, consistent with subparagraph (B), shall be enrolled first.

(3) (A) The third priority for services shall be given to eligible three-year-old or four-year-old children who are not enrolled in a state-funded transitional kindergarten program. This priority shall not include children eligible pursuant to clause (v) or (vii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8208 if they are from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, a child who is identified as a dual language learner shall be enrolled first.

(iii) If there are no children who are identified as dual language learners, the child that has been on the waiting list for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(4) (A) The fourth priority for services shall be given to
 three-year-old and four-year-old children of employees of a local educational agency not enrolled pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) Within this priority category, eligible children from families with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(5) (A) The fifth priority for services shall be given to eligible two-year-old children, to the extent the contractor has elected to offer services pursuant to Section 8207.1. This priority shall not include children eligible pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8208 if they are from families with incomes above the income
 eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, a child who is identified as a dual language learner shall be enrolled first.

(iii) If there are no children who are identified as dual language learners, the child that has been on the waiting list for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(6) (A) The sixth
 priority, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled, shall be children from families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the eligibility income threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) Within this priority category, priority shall be given to three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs interested in enrolling beyond those already enrolled in the set aside pursuant to Section 8208.

(7) (A) After all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled in the first through sixth priority categories, as described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, a contractor may enroll any eligible child pursuant to Section 8208.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, the child that has been on the waiting list
 for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(b) The Superintendent shall set criteria for, and may grant specific waivers of, the priorities established in this section for agencies that wish to serve specific populations, including children with exceptional needs or children of prisoners. These new waivers shall not include proposals to avoid appropriate fee schedules or admit ineligible families, but may include proposals to accept members of special populations in other than strict income order, as long as appropriate fees are paid.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 5.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

8210.

(a) Each applicant or contracting agency shall give priority for part-day programs according to the following:

(1) The first priority for services shall be given to three-year-old or four-year-old children who are recipients of child protective services or who are at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited and for whom there is a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency. If an agency is unable to enroll a child in this first priority category, the agency shall refer the child’s parent or guardian to local resources and referral services so that services for the child can be located.

(2) (A) The second priority for services shall be given to all
 three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes below the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) Within this priority category, children with exceptional needs from families with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(C) If enrollment of children with exceptional needs does not exceed the set aside pursuant to Section 8208, this priority category shall also include three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213. Families served under this subparagraph with the lowest income, consistent with subparagraph (B), shall be enrolled first.

(3) (A) The third priority for services shall be given to eligible three-year-old or four-year-old children who are not enrolled in a state-funded transitional kindergarten program. This priority shall not include children eligible pursuant to clause (v) or (vii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8208 if they are from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, a child who is identified as a dual language learner shall be enrolled first.

(iii) If there are no children who are identified as dual language learners, the child that has been on the waiting list for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(4) (A) The fourth priority for services shall be given to three-year-old and four-year-old children of employees of a local educational agency not enrolled pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(5) (A) The fifth priority, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled, shall be children from families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the eligibility income threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) Within this priority category, priority shall be given to three- and four-year-old children with
 exceptional needs interested in enrolling beyond those already enrolled in the set aside pursuant to Section 8208.

(6) (A) After all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled in the first through fifth priority categories, as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, a contractor may enroll any eligible child pursuant to Section 8208.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, the child that has been on the waiting list
 for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(b) The Superintendent shall set criteria for, and may grant specific waivers of, the priorities established in this section for agencies that wish to serve specific populations, including children with exceptional needs or children of prisoners. These new waivers shall not include proposals to avoid appropriate fee schedules or admit ineligible families, but may include proposals to accept members of special populations in other than strict income order, as long as appropriate fees are paid.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 6.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8211.

(a) Each applicant or contracting agency shall give priority for full-day programs according to the following:

(1) (A) The first priority for services shall be given to three-year-old or four-year-old children who are recipients of child protective services or who are at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited upon written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency. To the extent the contractor has elected to offer services pursuant to Section 8207.1, then priority for services shall be given to two-year-old children who are recipients of child protective services or who are at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited and for whom there is a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency.

(B) If an agency is unable to enroll a child in this first priority category, the agency shall refer the child’s parent or guardian to local resources and referral services so that services for the child can be located.

(2) (A) The second priority for services shall be given to all three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes below the income eligibility threshold, described in Section 8213.

(B) Within this priority category, children with exceptional needs from families with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(C) If enrollment of
 children with exceptional needs does not exceed the set aside pursuant to Section 8208, this priority category shall also include three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213. Families served under this subparagraph with the lowest income, consistent with subparagraph (B), shall be enrolled first.

(3) (A) The third priority for services shall be given to eligible three-year-old or four-year-old children who are not enrolled in a state-funded transitional kindergarten program. This priority shall not include children eligible pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8208 if they are from families with incomes above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213.

(B) (i) Within this priority category, eligible children with the lowest income according to the income ranking on the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, as published by the Superintendent at the time of enrollment, shall be enrolled first.

(ii) If two or more families have the same income ranking according to the most recent schedule of income ceiling eligibility table, a child who is identified as a dual language learner shall be enrolled first.

(iii) If there are no children who are identified as dual language learners, the child that has been on the waiting list for the longest time shall be admitted first.

(4) (A) The fourth priority for services shall be given to children of employees of a local educational agency.
